Louisiana, session 2026, SB154.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 404(K) is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
Art. 404. Appointment of jury commissions; term of office; oath; quorum;
performance of functions of jury commissions in certain parishes
* * *
K. In the parish of West Baton Rouge, the function of the jury
commission shall be performed by the clerk of court of West Baton Rouge
Parish or by a deputy clerk of court designated by the clerk in writing to act in
his stead in all matters affecting the jury commission. The clerk of court or his
designated deputy shall have the same powers, duties, and responsibilities, and
shall be governed by all applicable provisions of law pertaining to jury
commissioners. The clerk of court of West Baton Rouge Parish shall perform
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 154 ENROLLED
the duties and responsibilities otherwise imposed upon him by law with respect
to jury venires, shall coordinate the jury venire process, and shall receive the
compensation generally authorized for a jury commissioner.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.